District of Columbia statutes.
2-1431.07

Transfer of functions from Office of Risk Management.

All functions, personnel, records, and property assigned to the Office of Risk Management under section IV(B)(1) of Mayor’s Order 2006-58, issued May 23, 2006 (53 DCR 5314 ), shall be transferred to the Office of Disability Rights. This section shall apply 30 days after the date of the appointment of the Director of the Office.

Mar. 8, 2007, D.C. Law 16-239, § 8, 54 DCR 404